District of Columbia statutes.
25-742

Solicitation of drinks prohibited.

The licensee under an on-premises retailer’s license shall not:

(1)

Require, permit, suffer, encourage, or induce an entertainer or employee to solicit in the licensed establishment the purchase by a patron of any drink, whether alcoholic or non-alcoholic, or money with which to purchase the drink, for that entertainer or employee, or for any other person other than the patron and guests of the patron; or

(2)

Pay to the licensee’s agent or manager, or any other person frequenting the licensed establishment, a commission or any other compensation to solicit for herself, himself, or for others, the purchase by the patron of any drink, whether alcoholic or non-alcoholic.

May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959

History

This section is referenced in § 25-123.

Section References